nl: Spoelvereiste: Niet afspoelen; Optioneel afspoelen; Afspoelen; Andere
ro-RO: Cerință de clătire: Fără clătire; Clătire opțională; Cu clătire; Altele
ja: すすぎ要件: 洗い流し不要; 洗い流し任意; 洗い流し; その他
hr-HR: Zahtjev ispiranja: Bez ispiranja; Opciono ispiranje; Za ispiranje; Ostalo
bg-BG: Изискване за изплакване: Без изплакване; Изплакване по избор; С изплакване; Други
cs: Požadavek na oplachování: Bez oplachování; Volitelné oplachování; S oplachováním; Jiné
nb: Skyllekrav: Ikke-skylle; Valgfri skylling; Skylle av; Annet
es: Requisito de enjuague: Sin enjuague; Enjuague opcional; Con enjuague; Otros
fr: Exigence de rinçage: Sans rinçage; Rinçage optionnel; À rincer; Autre
pt-PT: Necessidade de enxaguar: Sem enxaguamento; Enxaguamento opcional; Com enxaguamento; Outro
en: Rinse requirement: No-rinse; Optional rinse; Rinse-off; Other
el: Απαίτηση ξεβγάλματος: Χωρίς ξέβγαλμα; Προαιρετικό ξέβγαλμα; Με ξέβγαλμα; Άλλο
ko: 헹굼 필요성: 헹굼 불필요; 선택적 헹굼; 헹굼 필요; 기타
hu: Öblítési követelmény: Nem kell öblíteni; Opcionális öblítés; Leöblítendő; Egyéb
sk-SK: Požiadavka na opláchnutie: Bez opláchnutia; Voliteľné opláchnutie; Opláchnuť; Iné
da: Skylningskrav: Ingen skylning; Valgfri skylning; Skal skylles af; Andet
pt-BR: Requisito de enxágue: Sem enxágue; Enxágue opcional; Com enxágue; Outro
lt-LT: Skalavimo reikalavimas: Neplaunamas; Nebūtina plauti; Nuplaunamas; Kita
ru: Необходимость смывания: Без смывания; Смывание по желанию; Требует смывания; Другой
it: Requisito di risciacquo: Senza risciacquo; Risciacquo opzionale; Da risciacquare; Altro
zh-CN: 冲洗要求: 免冲洗; 可选冲洗; 需冲洗; 其他
tr: Durulama gereksinimi: Durulama gerektirmez; İsteğe bağlı durulama; Durulanır; Diğer
vi: Yêu cầu rửa sạch: Không cần rửa; Tùy chọn rửa; Cần rửa sạch; Khác
sl-SI: Zahteva po izpiranju: Brez izpiranja; Izpiranje po želji; Za izpiranje; Drugo
de: Abspülanforderung: Ohne Ausspülen; Optionales Ausspülen; Abspülen; Sonstiges
zh-TW: 沖洗要求: 免沖洗; 可選沖洗; 需沖洗; 其他
sv: Sköljningskrav: Ingen sköljning; Valfri sköljning; Sköljs av; Övrigt
pl: Konieczność spłukiwania: Bez spłukiwania; Opcjonalne spłukiwanie; Do spłukania; Inne
th: ข้อกำหนดการล้างออก: ไม่ต้องล้างออก; ล้างออกหรือไม่ก็ได้; ล้างออก; อื่นๆ
fi: Huuhteluvaatimus: Ei huuhdeltava; Valinnainen huuhtelu; Huuhdeltava; Muu